Maryland, session 2025, SB0008.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
4–147.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0008*

SENATE BILL 8
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PROGRAM” MEANS THE MARYLAND CIVIC
EXCELLENCE PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(B) (1) THERE IS A MARYLAND CIVIC EXCELLENCE PROGRAM.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO RECOGNIZE STUDENTS
AND PUBLIC SCHOOLS THAT PROMOTE THE CIVIC READINESS AND CIVIC
ENGAGEMENT OF STUDENTS IN PUBLIC SCHOOLS IN THE STATE.
(C) THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION APPLY ONLY TO A LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEM THAT CHOOSES TO PARTICIPATE IN AND ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
(D) BEGINNING WITH THE 2026–2027 SCHOOL YEAR, EACH PARTICIPATING
LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL:
(1) AWARD A STUDENT A SEAL OF CIVIC EXCELLENCE IF THE
STUDENT APPLIES AND MEETS THE CRITERIA ESTABLISHED BY THE LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEM UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) DESIGNATE A PUBLIC SCHOOL AS A CENTER OF CIVIC
EXCELLENCE IF THE SCHOOL APPLIES AND MEETS THE CRITERIA ADOPTED BY THE
LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM UNDER SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION.
(E) AT MINIMUM, A PARTICIPATING LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM’S CRITERIA
FOR A SEAL OF CIVIC EXCELLENCE SHALL REQUIRE A STUDENT TO:
(1) (I) TAKE THE MARYLAND COMPREHENSIVE ASSESSMENT FOR
GOVERNMENT; AND
(II) MEET THE ASSESSMENT REQUIREMENTS FOR
GRADUATION;
(2) EARN A GRADE OF A OR B IN EACH OF THE FOLLOWING HIGH
SCHOOL SOCIAL STUDIES COURSES:
(I) UNITED STATES HISTORY;
(II) MODERN WORLD HISTORY; AND
(III) AMERICAN GOVERNMENT; AND
(3) COMPLETE AND DEMONSTRATE EVIDENCE OF AT LEAST 75 HOURS
OF STUDENT SERVICE, OF WHICH AT LEAST 30 HOURS SHALL BE DEDICATED TO A

SENATE BILL 8 3
SERVICE LEARNING PROJECT WITH A FOCUS ON COMMUNITY AND CIVIC
ENGAGEMENT.
(F) A PARTICIPATING LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL ESTABLISH
APPLICATION CRITERIA TO ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
(G) AT MINIMUM, A PARTICIPATING LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM’S CRITERIA
FOR A CENTER OF CIVIC EXCELLENCE DESIGNATION SHALL REQUIRE A PUBLIC
SCHOOL TO HAVE AT LEAST 50% OF THE STUDENTS IN ITS GRADUATING CLASS WHO
HAVE EARNED A SEAL OF CIVIC EXCELLENCE.
(H) (1) A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM THAT DETERMINES A STUDENT HAS
FULFILLED THE CRITERIA UNDER THE PROGRAM SHALL:
(I) AWARD THE STUDENT A SEAL OF CIVIC EXCELLENCE;
(II) RECORD THE AWARD ON THE STUDENT’S OFFICIAL HIGH
SCHOOL TRANSCRIPT; AND
(III) RECOGNIZE THE AWARD BY AWARDING A CORD OR MEDAL
OR BY ATTACHING OTHER INSIGNIA ON THE STUDENT’S HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA.
(2) A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM THAT DETERMINES THAT A PUBLIC
SCHOOL HAS FULFILLED THE CRITERIA UNDER THE PROGRAM SHALL:
(I) DESIGNATE THE SCHOOL AS A CENTER OF CIVIC
EXCELLENCE; AND
(II) RECOGNIZE THE DESIGNATION BY PROVIDING ANY OF THE
FOLLOWING:
1. A BANNER;
2. A GOVERNOR’S CITATION; OR
3. A CITATION FROM THE DEPARTMENT.
(I) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, AND EACH JULY 1 THEREAFTER, EACH
PARTICIPATING LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL SUBMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT A
REPORT ON THE PROGRAM BASED ON THE MOST RECENTLY COMPLETED SCHOOL
YEAR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.